Louisiana, session 2026, HB1212.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(36) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(36) R.S. 51:710.2(B), 705, 706, 936, 1363.1, 1404, 1926, 1934, 2113, 2182,
2262, 2318, 2370.3, 2370.16, 2370.25, 2370.27, 2389, 3301
* * *
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2698 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1212
Section 2. Chapter 70 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 51:3301, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 70: SURVEY ALL VULNERABLE ELECTRIC TRANSFORMERS ACT
§3301. SAVE Act
A. For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms have the meanings
ascribed to them:
(1) "Covered entity" means an electric utility or electric project developer,
owner, or operator within this state, regardless of public or private ownership or
jurisdiction under NERC.
(2) "Covered equipment" means any generation or transmission large power
transformer, including GSU, auto, step-down, or converter, with a high side,
wye-grounded winding with terminal voltage of two hundred kilovolts or greater.
(3) "Critical energy infrastructure information protocols", "critical electric
infrastructure information protocols", or "CEII" means specific engineering,
vulnerability, or detailed design protocols and procedures related to proposed or
existing critical infrastructure, whether physical or virtual, that relate to the
production, generation, transmission, transportation, or distribution of energy, the
unauthorized disclosure of which could pose a risk to the security, reliability, or
integrity of the infrastructure. The protocols are designed as confidential and exempt
from public disclosure.
(4) "GIC" means ground induced current, also known as geomagnetically
induced current, resulting from naturally occurring geomagnetic disturbances or the
late-time component of a high-altitude nuclear electromagnetic pulse.
(5) "NERC" means the North American Electric Reliability Corporation.
B.(1) Each covered entity shall conduct a technical assessment of all covered
equipment to determine vulnerability to GICs.
(2) The assessment shall do all of the following:
(a) Utilize the waveform in Figure 9 of IEC 61000-2-9, Edition 2.0
(2025-05), modeling a peak electric field of eighty five volts per kilometer in
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2698 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1212
covered entities existing DC circuit model developed for NERC GMD, or
geomagnetic disturbance, Standard TPL-007.
(b) Assume transformers are fully loaded during GIC exposure.
(c) Account for transformer age and condition using American National
Standards Institute/Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers Standard
C57.110 and Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers Standard C57.91.
(d) Identify susceptibility to half-cycle saturation, GIC-induced harmonics,
reactive power consumption, hot spot generation, and insulation degradation.
C.(1) By October 30, 2026, each covered entity shall submit a report on the
assessment conducted pursuant to this Chapter to the Governor's Office of Homeland
Security and Emergency Preparedness with copies to the Public Service Commission
and the United States Department of Energy.
(2) The report shall include, for each susceptible transformer, all of the
following:
(a) Transformer nameplate information with design specifications.
(b) Transformer location.
(c) Transformer purpose, including GSU, auto, step-down, or converter.
(d) Spreadsheet-formatted data and narrative analysis, including maximum
GIC in the neutral of each transformer.
(e) Recommended solutions to protect the grid against GIC by preventing or
reducing the half cycle saturation of transformers.
(f) Total cost to implement GIC protection hardware on susceptible
transformers.
(g) Priority list of transformers by damage risk and critical infrastructure
impact.
(h) Funding recommendations to protect at-risk transformers, including but
not limited to any of the following potential options:
(i) Government grants and direct funding programs, such as grid resilience
utility and industry grants, grid modernization grants, grid innovation program
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2698 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1212
grants, formula grants for preventing outages, and building resilient infrastructure
and communities, or BRIC, grants.
(ii) Loans and loan guarantees.
(iii) Regulatory and cost recovery mechanisms.
(iv) Tariffs and rebates.
(v) Tax credits and direct pay incentives.
(3) A public version of the report outlined in this Subsection shall be
submitted to the House of Representatives Select Committee on Homeland Security
with CEII redacted.
D. CEII data submitted pursuant to this Chapter shall be handled in
accordance with CEII protocols as defined in this Chapter. CEII shall be redacted
from public reports.
E. The director of the Governor's Office of Homeland Security and
Emergency Preparedness shall review the reports and recommendations of the
utilities, request further information as deemed necessary, and report to the governor
and the House of Representatives Select Committee on Homeland Security by April
1, 2027, with any recommendations to protect the state, its inhabitants, and
businesses.
F. Covered entities shall not rely solely on operational procedures, such as
load shedding or reactive power supply, to mitigate GIC risk. Such procedures are
not considered sufficient protection pursuant to this Chapter.
Section 3. This Act shall be known as and may be cited as the "Survey All
Vulnerable Electric Transformers Act" or "SAVE Act".